src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ac
+A+Utr+Sg+Indef: # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Indef:t # ;
adjobl ;

LEXICON ac
+A+Utr+Sg+Indef: # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Indef:t # ;
adjobl ;

LEXICON a1
+A+Utr+Sg+Indef: # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Indef:tt # ;
adjobl ;

LEXICON adjobl
+A+Utr+Sg+Def:a # ;
+A+Utr+Pl+Indef:a # ;
+A+Utr+Pl+Def:a # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Indef:t # ;
+A+Neu+Sg+Def:a # ;
+A+Neu+Pl+Indef:a # ;
+A+Neu+Pl+Def:a # ;
